Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB272.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 635.11. Infertility Care Coverage.--(a) A health insurance policy covered under this section shall include coverage for infertility care and shall waive cost-sharing requirements related to infertility care.(b) Infertility care coverage under this section shall be 12345678910111213141516171819202122 provided to covered individuals, including covered spouses and covered nonspouse dependents. Infertility care coverage under this section shall be provided without discrimination on the basis of age, ancestry, color, disability, domestic partner status, gender, gender expression, gender identity, genetic information, marital status, national origin, race, religion, sex or sexual orientation. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to interfere with the clinical judgment of a physician.(c) Infertility care coverage under this section shall be for the consultation, diagnosis and treatment of infertility, including the following:(1) Intrauterine insemination.(2) Cryopreservation and thawing of eggs, sperm and embryos.(3) Cryopreservation of ovarian tissue.(4) Cryopreservation of testicular tissue.(5) Embryo biopsy.(6) Diagnostic testing.(7) Fresh and frozen embryo transfers.(8) Egg retrievals with unlimited embryo transfers in accordance with the guidelines of the American Society for Reproductive Medicine, including the use of single embryo transfers when recommended and medically appropriate.(9) In vitro fertilization, including in vitro fertilization through the use of donor eggs, sperm or embryos and in vitro fertilization that involves the transfer of embryos to a gestational carrier or surrogate.(10) Assisted hatching.(11) Intracytoplasmic sperm injection.(12) Infertility medications.20250SB0272PN0226 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (13) Ovulation induction.(14) Storage of oocytes, sperm, embryos and tissue.(15) Surgery to address disorders of the female reproductive tract that impair fertility and to address disorders of sperm production or anatomic disorders of the male reproductive tract that impair fertility.(16) Medical and laboratory services that reduce excess embryo creation through egg cryopreservation and thawing.(17) Surrogacy, including the costs associated with the preparation for reception or introduction of embryos, oocytes or donor sperm into a surrogate or gestational carrier.(18) Gamete intrafallopian transfers.(19) Therapeutic devices.(20) Standard fertility preservation services for an individual who has a medical condition and is expected to undergo medication therapy, surgery, radiation, chemotherapy or other medical treatment that is recognized by a medical professional to cause a risk of impairment to fertility.(21) Any nonexperimental procedure for infertility recognized by the American Society for Reproductive Medicine, the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists or the Society for Assisted Reproductive Technology or by an infertility expert identified by the Department of Health.(22) Any other services, procedures, medications or devices related to the consultation, diagnosis and treatment of infertility.(d) A health insurance policy covered under this section may not:(1) contain preexisting condition exclusions or preexisting condition waiting periods to access the infertility care 20250SB0272PN0226 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 coverage required under this section;(2) use the prior diagnosis of infertility or prior treatment for infertility as a basis for excluding, limiting or otherwise restricting the availability of infertility care coverage required under this section; or(3) contain limitations on coverage for infertility benefits based solely on arbitrary factors, including the number of infertility care attempts or cost of infertility care.(e) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Cost-sharing." The share of costs covered by the patient, including a deductible, coinsurance, copayment or similar charge. The term does not include the payment of a health insurance policy premium."Health insurance policy." As follows:(1) Any individual or group health insurance policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan that provides medical or health care coverage by a health care facility or licensed health care provider on an expense-incurred service or prepaid basis and that is offered by or is governed under any of the following:(i) This act, including section 630.(ii) The children's health insurance program under Article XXIII-A.(iii) Subdivision (f) of Article IV of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the "Human Services Code."(iv) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the "Health Maintenance Organization Act."(v) 40 Pa.C.S. Chs. 61 (relating to hospital plan 20250SB0272PN0226 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 corporations) and 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations).(2) The term does not include any of the following:(i) Accident only.(ii) Credit only.(iii) Long-term care or disability income.(iv) Specified disease.(v) Medicare supplement.(vi) Tricare, including the Civilian Health and Medical Program of the Uniformed Services (CHAMPUS) supplement.(vii) Fixed indemnity.(viii) Dental only.(ix) Vision only.(x) Workers' compensation.(xi) An automobile medical payment under 75 Pa.C.S. (relating to vehicles)."Infertility." A disease historically defined by the failure to achieve a successful pregnancy after six to twelve months or more of regular, unprotected sexual intercourse or due to an individual's status and capacity to reproduce as an individual or with a partner."Physician." An individual licensed as a medical doctor by the State Board of Medicine to practice in this Commonwealth.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0272PN0226 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324